Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.714

Receivership files.

The receiver or director, as appropriate, may at any time after the expiration of one year from the order of final distribution, or from the date when the receivership has been completed, destroy any of the remaining files, records, documents, books of account, or other papers of the credit union that appear to be obsolete or unnecessary for future reference as part of the receivership files.

[ 1997 c 397 s 83.]